Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:

Req. No. 16267 Page 1

It is the intent of the Legislature to further the remedial and
educational purposes of the Tulsa Reconciliation Education and
Scholarship Act by authorizing certain admissions considerations
grounded in documented historical harm caused by the 1921 Tulsa Race
Massacre. Such consideration shall be applied in a race-neutral
manner and consistent with federal law.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2628 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Survivor of the 1921 Tulsa Race Massacre" means an
individual who personally experienced physical injury, destruction
of property, forced displacement, or loss of livelihood as a direct
result of events occurring in Tulsa, Oklahoma, between May 31 and
June 1, 1921;
2. "Harmed by the 1921 Tulsa Race Massacre" means an individual
who suffered one or more of the following as a result of the
Massacre or its immediate aftermath:
a. destruction, confiscation, or uncompensated loss of
real or personal property,
b. physical injury or death of an immediate family
member,
c. forced displacement from home or community,

Req. No. 16267 Page 2

d. loss of business, employment, or accumulated wealth
due to governmental action or inaction following the
Massacre, or
e. denial of insurance claims, legal remedies, or access
to rebuilding assistance related to the Massacre; and
3. "Descendant" means a direct lineal descendant of a person
harmed by the 1921 Tulsa Race Massacre.
B. Public institutions of higher education within The Oklahoma
State System of Higher Education may take into consideration during
the admissions process for purposes of admission an applicant's
status as a:
1. Survivor of the 1921 Tulsa Race Massacre; or
2. Verified direct lineal descendant of a person harmed by the
1921 Tulsa Race Massacre.
Implementation of this subsection shall occur only to the extent
permitted by federal law.
C. Eligibility for consideration pursuant to this section shall
be based solely on documented historical harm or lineal descent from
a person harmed by the 1921 Tulsa Race Massacre and shall be applied
without regard to race, color, ethnicity, or national origin.
D. 1. An applicant seeking consideration pursuant to this
section shall present verifiable documentation establishing his or
her status as a survivor or descendant.
2. Verification may be conducted by:
Req. No. 16267 Page 3

a. Justice for Greenwood, or
b. another professional genealogical, historical, or
descendant verification organization that:
(1) demonstrates subject matter expertise in Tulsa
Race Massacre lineage or documentation,
(2) is in good standing with the State of Oklahoma,
and
(3) is recognized by the Oklahoma State Regents for
Higher Education for purposes of this section.
3. Verifiable documentation may include, but shall not be
limited to, the categories of family, public, and institutional
records described in subsection C of Section 2621 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
E. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of this
section, including procedures for documentation review and
admissions consideration, consistent with existing law and
institutional autonomy.
F. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
1. Require any institution to admit any applicant;
2. Create a quota, set-aside, preference mandate, or
entitlement;
3. Limit the authority of the State Regents under the Tulsa
Reconciliation Education and Scholarship Act; or
Req. No. 16267 Page 4

4. Alter eligibility requirements for scholarships authorized
pursuant to Sections 2621 through 2625 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.

60-2-16267 AQH 02/11/26



















Req. No. 16267 Page 5